Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2135.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-7-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-7 entitled "By Possession
and Prescription" is hereby repealed.
34-7-4. Right of footway denied.
No right of footway, except claimed in connection with a right to pass with carriages, shall
be acquired by prescription or adverse use for any length of time.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004192
========